Connecticut, session 2026, HB05289.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 1-2 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[Each] (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
any provision of the general statutes, the special acts or the charter,
ordinances or regulations of any [town, city or borough which]
municipality that requires the [insertion of an advertisement]
publication of a legal notice in a daily newspaper shall be construed to
permit such [advertisement to be inserted] publication in a weekly
newspaper. [; but this section shall not be construed to reduce or
otherwise affect the time required by law for giving such notice.]
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, if
a provision described in subdivision (1) of this subsection applies to a
municipality, such provision shall be construed to (A) require the
posting of such notice, which notice shall include the date of such
posting, in a conspicuous location on the Internet web site of such
municipality, and (B) permit such publication in a daily or weekly
newspaper in addition to such posting on such Internet web site. If any
provision of the general statutes, any special act or any local charter,
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5289
ordinance or regulation requires a municipality to publish a notice more
than once, a municipality may comply with such requirement by
posting such notice on the Internet web site of the municipality the
number of times and at such intervals as required by such provision. A
municipality shall retain a physical copy of each notice posted on such
municipality's Internet web site for not less than one year following such
posting.
(b) Whenever notice of any action or other proceeding is required to
be given by publication in a newspaper, either by statute or order of
court, the newspaper selected for that purpose, unless otherwise
expressly prescribed, shall be one [having] that has a substantial
circulation in the [town] municipality in which at least one of the parties,
for whose benefit such notice is given, resides.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise
affect the time required by law for giving such notice.
(d) For the purposes of this section, "municipality" means a town, city
or borough, consolidated town and city or consolidated town and
borough.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-2
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2